Utah statutes.
17D-1-506.   Governing body required to fix rates to cover district expenses
and bonds.
The governing body shall fix the rate or rates for services or commodities
provided by the special service district that will, in conjunction with the
proceeds of any maintenance and operation tax and other special service
district revenues:
(1)  pay the special service district's operating expenses;
(2)  provide for repairs and depreciation of works owned or operated by the
special service district;
(3)  pay the interest on any bonds issued by the special service district; and
(4)  provide, as much as practicable, a sinking or other fund to pay the
principal of the bonds as they become due.
